District of Columbia statutes.
42-1009

Right of grantor to reserve power.

The grantor in any conveyance may reserve to himself any power, beneficial or in trust, which he might lawfully grant to another, and every power thus reserved shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter as if granted to another.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1045
1981 Ed., § 45-109.
1973 Ed., § 45-1009.